Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 4A Cashing of Payment Instruments
7-1-706.
Record keeping obligations; investigations and examinations by the department; examination fees; administration of oaths and issuing of subpoenas; confidentiality; civil liability.

Each licensee shall make, keep, and use in its business such books, accounts, and records as the department may require to enforce the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under it. Each licensee shall preserve such books, accounts, and records for five years or such greater period of time as prescribed in the department’s rules and regulations.

Records required to be made, kept, and preserved pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may be maintained in a photographic, electronic, or other similar form.

Records required to be made, kept, and preserved pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may be maintained at a location outside of this state so long as such records are produced to the commissioner at the department’s main office within ten days of the date of a written request by the department to the licensee.

The department shall investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of any licensee pertaining to cashing payment instruments. The department may conduct such investigations or examinations at least once every 60 months. The department may accept examination reports performed and produced by other state or federal agencies in satisfaction of this requirement unless the department determines that the examinations are not available or do not provide information necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the department under this article.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this Code section, the department may alter the frequency or scope of investigations or examinations through rules or regulations prescribed by the department. In addition, if the department determines that based on the records submitted to the department and past history of operations of the licensee in the state such investigations or examinations are unnecessary, then the department may waive such investigations and examinations.

In addition to any other authority set forth under this article, the department shall be authorized to conduct investigations and examinations of applicants and licensees as follows:

The department shall have the authority to access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including, but not limited to:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including nonconviction data;

Personal history and experience information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a; and

Any other documents, information, or evidence the department deems relevant to the inquiry, examination, or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of such documents, information, or evidence;

The department may review, investigate, or examine any licensee or person subject to this article as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this article;

Each licensee or person subject to this article shall make available to the department, upon request, any books and records relating to the activities of cashing payment instruments;

No licensee or person subject to investigation or examination under this article shall knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, documents, files, computer records, evidence, or other information; and

In order to carry out the purposes of this Code section, the department may:

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, documents, records, information, or evidence or by utilizing standardized or uniform methods or procedures;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials within or outside this state; and

Accept audit reports or portions of audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant on behalf of the licensee or person subject to this article covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the department.

Each licensee shall pay an examination fee as established by the rules and regulations of the department to cover the cost of an examination or investigation.

The department, in its discretion, may:

Make such public or private examination or investigation within or outside of this state as it deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated this article, any rule or regulation, or order issued under this article, to aid in the enforcement of this article, or to assist in the prescribing of rules and regulations pursuant to this article;

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated;

Request any financial data from an applicant or licensee; and

Conduct an on-site examination of a licensee at any location of the licensee without prior notice to the licensee.

For the purpose of conducting any examination or investigation as provided in this Code section, the department shall have the power to administer oaths, to call any party to testify under oath in the course of such examinations or investigations, to require the attendance of witnesses, to require the production of books, accounts, records, documents, and papers, and to take the depositions of witnesses; and for such purposes the department is authorized to issue a subpoena for any witness or for the production of documentary evidence. Such subpoenas may be served by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the addressee’s business mailing address or by examiners appointed by the department or shall be directed for service to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides or is found or where the person in custody of any books, accounts, records, documents, or papers resides or is found.

The department may issue and apply to enforce subpoenas in this state at the request of any government agency, department, organization, or entity regulating cashing payment instruments in another state if the activities constituting the alleged violation for which the information is sought would be a violation of this article if the alleged activities had occurred in this state.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this article to any person, a superior court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application by the department, may issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear before the court to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished as contempt by the court.

Examinations and investigations conducted under this article and information obtained by the department in the course of its duties under this article are confidential, except as provided in this subsection, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 7-1-70. In addition to the exceptions set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-70, the department is authorized to share information obtained under this article with other state and federal regulatory agencies or law enforcement authorities. In the case of such sharing, the safeguards to confidentiality already in place within such agencies or authorities shall be deemed adequate. The commissioner or an examiner specifically designated may disclose such information as is necessary to conduct a civil or administrative investigation or proceeding. Information contained in the records of the department that is not confidential and may be made available to the public either on the department’s website, upon receipt by the department of a written request, or in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry shall include:

The name, business address, and telephone, facsimile, and unique identifier of a licensee;

The names and titles of the principal officers;

The name of the owner or owners thereof;

The business address of a licensee’s registered agent for service;

The name, business address, telephone number, and facsimile number of all locations of a licensee;

The terms of or a copy of any bond filed by a licensee;

Information concerning any violation of this article, any rule or regulation, or order issued under this article, provided that the information is derived from a final order of the department; and

Imposition of an administrative fine or penalty under this article.

The authority to conduct an examination or investigation as provided for in this Code section shall remain in effect whether such licensee or person acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state or claims to act without such authority.

In the absence of malice, fraud, or bad faith, a person is not subject to civil liability arising out of furnishing the department with information required by this article or required by the department under the authority granted in this article. No civil cause of action of any nature shall arise against such person:

For any information relating to suspected prohibited conduct furnished to or received from law enforcement officials, their agents, or employees or to or from other regulatory or licensing authorities;

For any such information furnished to or received from other persons subject to the provisions of this article; or

For any information furnished in complaints filed with the department.

The commissioner or any employee or agent of the department shall not be subject to civil liability, and no civil cause of action of any nature shall exist against such persons arising out of the performance of activities or duties under this article or by publication of any report of activities under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-706

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 23/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 29/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 17/HB 781; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, in the last sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (l), substituted “website, upon” for “website or upon” and inserted “, or in the Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “60 months” for “24 months” near the end of the second sentence of subsection (d).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, substituted “unique identifier” for “license numbers” in paragraph (l)(1). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in the last sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (l).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-706.1.
Regulatory interpretation and enforcement.

Without limiting the power conferred by Article 1 of this chapter, the department may make reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the interpretation and enforcement of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-706.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-707.
Required endorsement by licensee; immediate payments; deferment of payment; identification requirements; acceptable fee for services.

No licensee shall deposit with any financial institution a payment instrument it has accepted and exchanged for monetary value unless such payment instrument is endorsed by the licensee.

No licensee shall receive any payment instrument with payment deferred pending collection. Payment shall be made immediately in cash for every payment instrument accepted by the licensee and exchanged for monetary value for a fee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, checks may be accepted for collection with payment deferred where the licensee has posted a surety bond in the same manner as prescribed for licensed money transmitters or licensed payment instrument sellers under Code Section 7-1-683.2 and under the same conditions as set forth under Code Section 7-1-687. The surety bond shall be in the aggregate amount of $10,000.00 for each location operated by the licensee, if the licensee operates three or fewer locations, plus $5,000.00 per location for the fourth and fifth locations operated by the licensee, plus $1,000.00 for each location operated by the licensee in excess of the fifth location. The bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the department and shall run to the State of Georgia for the benefit of any claimant against the licensee arising out of the licensee’s business of cashing payment instruments with payment deferred in this state. The bond shall not be canceled by either the licensee or the corporate surety except upon notice to the department by registered or certified mail, statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested, or electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and such cancellation shall be effective no sooner than 30 days after receipt by the department of such notice. In no event shall payment of a check be deferred past the time the licensee has collected on the check. Upon collection, payment shall be made immediately to the party from whom the licensee accepted the check.

No licensee shall cash payment instruments made payable to a payee other than an individual unless such licensee has previously obtained appropriate documentation from the authorized executive officer of such payee clearly indicating the authority of the individual to cash the payment instrument on behalf of the payee.

No licensee shall cash payment instruments without identification of the bearer of such instrument, and any person seeking to cash payment instruments shall be required to submit such reasonable identification as shall be prescribed by the department; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit a licensee from cashing payment instruments simultaneously with the verification and establishment of the identity of the presenter by means other than the presentation of identification.

No licensee shall:

Charge a fee for cashing payment instruments in excess of 5 percent of the face amount of the payment instrument or $5.00, whichever is greater;

Charge a fee for cashing payment instruments in excess of 3 percent of the face amount of the payment instrument or $5.00, whichever is greater, if such payment instrument is state public assistance or a federal social security benefit made payable to the bearer of such payment instrument; or

Charge a fee for cashing payment instruments in excess of 10 percent of the face amount of the payment instrument or $5.00, whichever is greater, if such payment instrument is a personal check or money order. For purposes of this subsection, “personal check or money order” means a payment instrument drawn against the account of an individual.

No licensee shall engage in any activity that would subject the licensee to suspension or revocation of its license pursuant to this article or any activity that the department may prohibit by rule or regulation.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-707

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 23/HB 143.

7-1-707.1.
Posting of fees for cashing payment instruments.

In every location operated by a licensee, there shall be conspicuously posted and at all times displayed a notice stating the charges for cashing payment instruments.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-707.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-708.
Grounds for suspension or revocation of license; employment of individuals subject to cease and desist order; administrative review.

The department may suspend or revoke an original or renewal license issued pursuant to this article if it finds that any ground or grounds exist which would require or warrant the refusal of an application for the issuance or renewal of a license if such an application were then before it. The department may also deny an application or suspend or revoke an original or renewal license issued pursuant to this article if it finds that the licensee has:

Committed any fraud, engaged in any dishonest activities, or made any misrepresentation;

Violated any provisions of this article, any rule or regulation issued pursuant thereto, any order issued by the department, or any other law in the course of its dealings as a licensee;

Made a false statement in an original or renewal application for licensure or failed to give a true reply to a question in an original or renewal application;

Demonstrated incompetency or untrustworthiness to act as a licensee;

Failed to pay, within 30 days after it becomes final, a judgment recovered in any court by a claimant or creditor in an action arising out of the licensee’s business of cashing payment instruments;

Purposely withheld, deleted, destroyed, or altered information requested by an examiner of the department or made false statements or misrepresentations to the department; or

Operated in an unsafe or unsound manner.

The department shall not issue a license to an applicant and may revoke a license if such applicant or licensee is subject to or employs any person subject to a final cease and desist order that has been issued within the preceding five years if such order was based on a violation of this article. Each applicant or licensee shall, before hiring a covered employee, examine the department’s public records to determine that such covered employee is not subject to a cease and desist order.

The department shall not issue a license to an applicant and may revoke a license if such applicant or licensee is subject to or employs any person whose license issued pursuant to this article was revoked within the preceding five years. Each applicant or licensee shall, before hiring a covered employee, examine the department’s public records to determine that such covered employee’s license was not revoked.

The department shall not issue a license to an applicant and may revoke a license if it finds that any person who is a director, officer, partner, ultimate equitable owner of the applicant or licensee or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant or licensee has been in one or more of those roles as a licensee whose application has been denied or license revoked or suspended within five years of the date of the application.

Notice of the department’s intention to enter an order denying an application for a license or suspending or revoking a license shall be given to the applicant or licensee in writing, sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to the principal place of business of such applicant or licensee. If a person refuses to accept service of the notice by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, the notice or order shall be served by the commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representative under any other method of lawful service, and the person shall be personally liable to the commissioner for a sum equal to the actual costs incurred to serve the notice or order. This liability shall be paid upon notice and demand by the commissioner or the commissioner’s representative and shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other fees or fines administered by the commissioner. Within 20 days of the date of the notice of intention to enter an order of denial, suspension, or revocation under this article, the applicant or licensee may request in writing a hearing to contest the order. If a hearing is not requested in writing within 20 days of the date of such notice of intention, the department shall enter a final order regarding the denial, suspension, or revocation. Any final order of the department denying, suspending, or revoking a license shall state the grounds upon which it is based and shall be effective on the date of issuance. A copy thereof shall be forwarded promptly by mail addressed to the principal place of business of such applicant or licensee.

A decision by the department denying an application for license or of an order suspending or revoking a license shall be subject to review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Whenever the department initiates an administrative action against a current licensee or an applicant, the department may pursue such action to its conclusion despite the fact that a licensee may withdraw or fail to renew its license or an applicant may withdraw its application.

The suspension or revocation of a license under this Code section does not alter, ameliorate, or void a licensee’s duties or liabilities under any existing contract entered into by the licensee prior to such suspension or revocation.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply when an application for a license is denied or a license is suspended as provided in Code Section 7-1-708.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-708

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-708.1.
Denial or suspension of license for student borrowers in default prohibited;
denial or suspension for failing to comply with child support requirements.

Where an applicant or licensee has been found to be a borrower in default under the Georgia Higher Education Loan Program as determined by the Georgia Higher Education Assistance Corporation or has been certified by any entity of the federal government for nonpayment or default or breach of a repayment or service obligation under any federal educational loan, loan repayment, or service conditional scholarship program, such action shall not be grounds for denial of an application or suspension of a license.

Where an applicant or licensee has been found not in compliance with an order for child support as provided in Code Section 19-6-28.1 or 19-11-9.3, such action shall be sufficient grounds for denial of an application or suspension of a license. In such actions, the hearing and appeal procedures provided for in Code Section 19-6-28.1 or 19-11-9.3 shall be the only such procedures required under this article. The department shall be permitted to share, without liability, information on its applications or other forms with appropriate state agencies to assist them in recovering child support.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-708.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 1-3/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subsection (a), rewrote the first sentence, which read: “Where an applicant or licensee has been found to be a borrower in default, as defined in Code Section 20-3-295, such action shall be sufficient grounds for denial of an application or suspension of a license.” and deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “In such actions, the hearing and appeal procedures provided for in said Code section shall be the only procedures required under this article. The department shall be permitted to share, without liability, information on its applications or other forms with appropriate state agencies to assist them in collecting outstanding student loan debt.”

7-1-708.2.
Issuance of cease and desist orders; administrative and judicial enforcement; penalty for noncompliance.

The department may issue an order requiring a person to cease and desist immediately from unauthorized activities whenever it shall appear to the department that:

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person has violated any law of this state or any order or regulation of the department, and such cease and desist order shall be final 20 days after it is issued unless the person to whom it is issued makes a written request within such 20 day period for a hearing; or

A person not licensed under this article is engaging in or has engaged in activities requiring licensure under this article, which such cease and desist order shall be final 30 days from the date of issuance, and there shall be no opportunity for an administrative hearing. If the proper license or evidence of exemption is obtained within the 30 day period, the order shall be rescinded by the department.

The cease and desist order shall be in writing, sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery and addressed to the person’s business address and, if the person is an individual, to the individual’s personal address. Any cease and desist order sent to a person at its business address and, if an individual, his or her personal address that is returned to the department as “refused” or “unclaimed” shall be deemed as received and lawfully served.

Any hearing authorized under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Whenever a person shall fail to comply with the terms of a final order or decision of the department issued pursuant to this article, the department may, through the Attorney General and upon notice of three days to such person, petition the principal court for an order directing such person to obey the order of the department within the period of time as shall be fixed by the court. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall allow a motion to show cause why it should not be granted. After a hearing upon the merits or after failure of such person to appear when ordered, the court shall grant the petition of the department upon a finding that the order of the department was properly issued.

Any person who violates the terms of any final order or decision issued pursuant to this article shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00. Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. In determining the amount of penalty, the department shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty relative to the size of the financial resources of such person, the good faith efforts of such person to comply with the order, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by such person, and such other factors or circumstances as shall have contributed to the violation. The department may at its discretion compromise, modify, or refund any penalty which is subject to imposition or has been imposed pursuant to this Code section. Any person assessed as provided in this subsection shall have the right to request a hearing into the matter within ten days after notification of the assessment has been served upon the licensee involved; otherwise, such penalty shall be final except as to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

Judicial review of any final order or decision of the department entered pursuant to this article shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department.

In addition to any other administrative penalties authorized by this article, the department may, by rule or regulation, prescribe administrative fines for violations of this article and any rules and regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-708.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-709.
Penalty for violation of article.

Any person, partnership, association, or corporation and the several members, officers, directors, agents, ultimate equitable owners, and employees thereof that shall violate any of the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, which shall be punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than $500.00, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-709

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-709.1.
No limitation on common law liability or state prosecution.

Nothing in this article shall limit any statutory or common law right of any person to bring any action in any court for any act involved in cashing payment instruments or the right of the state to punish any person for any violation of any law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-709.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982.

7-1-709.2.
Continuing effectiveness of existing licenses.

Every license in force and effect under the former provisions of this article, relating to cashing checks, drafts, or money orders for consideration, on July 1, 2014, shall remain in full force and effect on July 1, 2014, and all such existing licensees shall be required to renew their licenses pursuant to Code Section 7-1-704.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-709.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 2/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 7/HB 737.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, “July 1, 2014,” was substituted for “the date of enactment of this article” and “July 1, 2014” was substituted for “the effective date of this article” in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90, incorrectly referenced the language near the beginning of this Code section as “Article 4 of Chapter 1 of this title.”